Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Mississippi Gulf Region Utility Act
§ 49-17-763.
Powers of county authority in connection with issuance of bonds.

The county authority shall have power in connection with the issuance of its bonds pursuant to this act to:

Covenant as to the use of any or all of its property, real or personal;

Redeem the bonds, to covenant for their redemption and to provide the terms and conditions thereof;

Covenant to charge rates, fees and charges sufficient to meet operating and maintenance expenses, renewals and replacements, principal and debt service on bonds, creation and maintenance of any reserves required by a bonds resolution, trust indenture or other security instrument and to provide for any margins or coverages over and above debt service on the bonds deemed desirable for the marketability of the bonds;

Covenant and prescribe as to events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds shall become or may be declared due before maturity, as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived and as to the consequences of default and the remedies of the registered owners of the bonds;

Covenant as to the mortgage or pledge of or the grant of a security interest in any real or personal property and all or any part of the revenues from any designated system or any part thereof or any revenue-producing contract or contracts made by a county authority with any person to secure the payment of bonds, subject to such agreements with the registered owners of bonds as may then exist;

Covenant as to the custody, collection, securing, investment and payment of any revenues, assets, monies, funds or property with respect to which a county authority may have any rights or interest;

Covenant as to the purposes to which the proceeds from the sale of any bonds then or thereafter to be issued may be applied, and the pledge of such proceeds to secure the payment of the bonds;

Covenant as to the limitations on the issuance of any additional bonds, the terms upon which additional bonds may be issued and secured, and the refunding of outstanding bonds;

Covenant as to the rank or priority of any bonds with respect to any lien or security;

Covenant as to the procedure by which the terms of any contract with or for the benefit of the registered owners of bonds may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the registered owners of which must consent thereto, and the manner in which such consent may be given;

Covenant as to the custody of any of its properties or investments, the safekeeping thereof, the insurance to be carried thereon, and the use and disposition of insurance proceeds;

Covenant as to the vesting in a trustee or trustees, within or outside the state, of such properties, rights, powers and duties in trust as such county authority may determine;

Covenant as to the appointing and providing for the duties and obligations of a paying agent or paying agents or other fiduciaries within or outside the state;

Make all other covenants and to do any and all such acts and things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure its bonds, or in the absolute discretion of the county authority tend to make the bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts or things may not be enumerated herein; it being the intention hereof to give any county authority power to do all things in the issuance of bonds and in the provisions for security thereof which are not inconsistent with the Constitution of the state; and

Execute all instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers herein granted or in the performance of covenants or duties, which may contain such covenants and provisions, as any purchaser of the bonds of the county authority may reasonably require.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 32, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-765.
Appointment of trustee to represent bond owners; appointment of receiver.

The county authority may, in any authorizing resolution of the board of directors, trust indenture or other security instrument relating to its bonds issued pursuant to this act, provide for the appointment of a trustee who shall have such powers as are provided therein to represent the registered owners of any issue of bonds in the enforcement or protection of their rights under any such resolution, trust indenture or security instrument. The county authority may also provide in such resolution, trust indenture or other security instrument that the trustee, or in the event that the trustee so appointed shall fail or decline to so protect and enforce such registered owners’ rights then such percentage of registered owners as shall be set forth in, and subject to the provisions of, such resolution, trust indenture or other security interest, may petition the court of proper jurisdiction for the appointment of a receiver of the county authority’s systems, the revenues of which are pledged to the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds of such registered owners. Such receiver may exercise any power as may be granted in any such resolution, trust indenture or security instrument to enter upon and take possession of, acquire, construct or reconstruct or operate and maintain such system, fix charges for services of the system and enforce collection thereof, and receive all revenues derived from such system or facilities and perform the public duties and carry out the contracts and obligations of such county authority in the same manner as such county authority itself might do, all under the direction of such court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 33, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-767.
Exemption of county authority from taxes and fees; bonds to be free from taxation; exceptions.

The exercise of the powers granted by this act will be in all respects for the benefit of the people of the state, for their well-being and prosperity and for the improvement of their social and economic conditions, and the county authority shall not be required to pay any tax or assessment on any property owned by the county authority under the provisions of this act or upon the income therefrom; nor shall the county authority be required to pay any recording fee or transfer tax of any kind on account of instruments recorded by it or on its behalf.

Any bonds issued by the county authority under and pursuant to the provisions of this act, their transfer and the income therefrom shall at all times be free from taxation by the state or any local unit or political subdivision or other instrumentality of the state, excepting inheritance and gift taxes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 34, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-769.
Bonds as legal investments and securities.

All bonds issued under the provisions of this act shall be legal investments for trustees, other fiduciaries, savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi; and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of the state and all municipalities and other political subdivisions thereof for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 35, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-771.
Rights and powers of county authority to remain unchanged while bonds are outstanding and unpaid.

The state hereby covenants with the registered owners of any bonds of any county authority that so long as the bonds are outstanding and unpaid the state will not limit or alter the rights and powers of any county authority under this act to conduct the activities referred to herein in any way pertinent to the interests of the bondholders, including, without limitation, such county authority’s right to charge and collect rates, fees, assessments and charges and to fulfill the terms of any covenants made with the registered owners of the bonds, or in any other way impair the rights and remedies of the registered owners of the bonds, unless provision for full payment of such bonds, by escrow or otherwise, has been made pursuant to the terms of the bonds or the resolution, trust indenture or security interest securing the bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 36, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-773.
Advance of funds or issuance of notes authorized; terms and conditions.

For the purposes of satisfying any temporary cash flow demands and deficiencies, and to maintain a working balance for the county authority, the county, municipalities or public agencies within the geographic boundaries of the county authority, or other persons, subject to their lawful authority to do so, are authorized to advance, at any time, such funds which, in its discretion, are necessary, or borrow such funds by issuance of notes, for initial capital contribution and to cover start-up costs until such times as sufficient bonds, assets and revenues have been secured to satisfy the needs of the county authority for its management, operation and formation. To this end, the county, municipality, public agency or person, subject to their lawful authority to do so, shall advance such funds, or borrow such funds by issuance of notes, under such terms and conditions as may be provided by resolution of the governing body, or other persons as defined in this act, subject to their lawful authority to do so, except that each such resolution shall state:

The need for the proceeds advanced or borrowed;

The amount to be advanced or the amount to be borrowed;

The maximum principal amount of any note issued the interest rate or maximum interest rate to be incurred, and the maturity date of said note;

In addition, the governing body, or other persons as defined in this act, subject to their lawful authority to do so, may arrange for lines of credit with any bank, firm or person for the purpose of providing an additional source of repayment for notes issued pursuant to this section.Amounts drawn on a line of credit may be evidenced by negotiable or nonnegotiable notes or other evidences of indebtedness and contain such terms and conditions as the governing body, or other persons as defined in this act, subject to their lawful authority to do so, may authorize in the resolution approving the same;

The governing body of the county, municipalities or other persons as defined in this act, subject to their lawful authority to do so, may authorize the repayment of such advances, notes, lines of credit and other debt incurred under this section, along with all costs associated with the same, including, but not limited to, rating agency fees, printing costs, legal fees, bank or trust company fees, line of credit fees and other charges to be reimbursed by the county authority under such terms and conditions as are reasonable and are to be provided for by resolution of the governing body, or terms agreed upon with other persons as defined in this act, subject to their lawful authority to do so;

In addition, the governing body of the county, municipality or public agency may lease or donate office space and equipment to the county authority under such terms and conditions as are reasonable and are to be provided for by resolution of the governing body, or terms agreed upon by the county authority.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 37, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).

§ 49-17-775.
Severability of provisions.

If any clause, sentence, paragraph, section or part of the provisions of this act shall be adjudged by any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair or invalidate the remainder thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judgment shall have been rendered.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 546, § 38, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2006.).